Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3605
Minor traffic violations; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 29-3606 to 29-3609:

(1) Department means the Department of Motor Vehicles; and

(2) Minor traffic violation does not include leaving the scene of an accident, sections 60-696 to 60-698, driving under the influence of alcoholic liquor or drugs, sections 60-4,164, 60-6,196, and 60-6,211.01, reckless driving or willful reckless driving, sections 60-6,213 and 60-6,214, participating in a speed competition, section 60-6,195, operating a motor vehicle to avoid arrest, section 28-905, refusing a breath or blood test, sections 60-4,164, 60-6,197, 60-6,197.04, and 60-6,211.02, driving on a suspended or revoked operator's license, sections 60-4,107 to 60-4,110 and 60-6,197.06, speeding twenty or more miles per hour over the speed limit, operating a motor vehicle without insurance or other financial responsibility in violation of the Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, any injury accident, or any violation which is classified as a misdemeanor or a felony.

Laws 2002, LB 1303, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 208, § 3.

Motor Vehicle Safety Responsibility Act, see section 60-569.